src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ma' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:man EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:miwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:man EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:mishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:mishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:mishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:mishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:mishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:mishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:misha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:mishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:miwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:miwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:miwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:miwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:miwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:mibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:mibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:waabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:waabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:waabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:banii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:waabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:waabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:baniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VV                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_VV_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NA_Class=NA_VV_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VV, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_VV_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NA+Dim+Loc:nsing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+LocDist:nsikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:nsa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:nsan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvSg:nsan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc:nzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+LocDist:nzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:nzhisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:nzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvSg:nzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxPl:nzhishag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxSg:nzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc:nzhishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:nsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:nsibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:nsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:nsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:nsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:nsibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:nsibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxSg:nsiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxPl:nsag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxSg:ns EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Voc:nsidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Loc:ng EncliticRoot ;
+NA+LocDist:kaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:n EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvSg:n EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Loc:ishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+LocDist:ishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:isha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvSg:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxPl:ishag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxSg:ish EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Voc:ishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:banii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:baneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:baniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxSg:ban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxPl:g EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxSg: EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Voc:dog EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VVny                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary
0:%>%> NA_Class=NA_VVny_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VVny                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_VVny_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NA_Class=NA_VVny_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NA_Class=NA_VVny_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NA_Class=NA_VVny_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NA_Class=NA_VVny_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VVny                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Stems
abinoojiinh:abinoojiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
abinoojiinh:abinoonjiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
anaamisagadoweshiinh:anaamisagadoweshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
andookomeshiinh:andookomeshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
anishinaabe-abinoonjiinh:anishinaabe-abinoonjiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
anishinaabe-mindimooyenh:anishinaabe-mindimooyenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
apakwaanaajiinh:apakwaanaajiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
asabikeshiinh:asabikeshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
ashaageshiinh:ashaageshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
awesiinh:awesiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
baaka'aakwenh:baaka'aakwenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
bagwaji-opin:bagwaji-opiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
banajaanh:banajaanhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
bapakwaanaajiinh:bapakwaanaajiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
biimaskodishiinh:biimaskodishiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
bineshiinh:bineshiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
boodashkwaanijiinh:boodashkwaanijiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
boodaskwaanishinh:boodaskwaanishinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
boodoonh:boodoonhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
bwaani-giigoony:bwaani-giigoony1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gaagiigidoo-bineshiinh:gaagiigidoo-bineshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gaakaabishiinh:gaakaabishiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gaaski-giigoonh:gaaski-giigoonhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gaazhagensiwi-bineshiinh:gaazhagensiwi-bineshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gibadoonh:gibadoony1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gibodoonh:gibodoonhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gigijigaaneshiinh:gigijigaaneshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
giigoonh:giigoonhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
giigoonhwasab:giigoonhwasaby1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
giikiibidikomeshiinh:giikiibidikomeshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gijigijigaaneshiinh:gijigijigaaneshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
ginooshkinzhii-waawaabiganoojiinh:ginooshkinzhii-waawaabiganoojiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gishkishenh:gishkishenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
goshkongeshiinh:goshkongeshiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gwaashkwaashkwandaabiganoojiinh:gwaashkwaashkwandaabiganoojiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gwaashkwani-waawaabiganoojiinh:gwaashkwani-waawaabiganoojiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
gwegawiyaanh:gwegawiyaanhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
jigijigaaneshiinh:jigijigaaneshiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
jiibisenh:jiibisenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
jiichiigaanaandaweshiinh:jiichiigaanaandaweshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
jiichiigaandaweshiinh:jiichiigaandaweshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
jiichiishkiwenh:jiichiishkiwenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
makadepwaaganasin:makadepwaaganasiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
makadewasin:makadewasiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
manidoo-bineshiinh:manidoo-bineshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
manoominikeshiinh:manoominikeshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
memaangishenh:memaangishenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
mindimoowenh:mindimooweny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
mindimooyenh:mindimooyenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
mishiikenh:mishiikenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
miskopwaaganasin:miskopwaaganasiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
mizhiikenh:mizhiikenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
naabe-bineshiinh:naabe-bineshiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
nandookomeshiinh:nandookomeshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
niizhoodenh:niizhoodenhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
obikwaanaajiinh:obikwaanaajiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
odaapinigewaawasoo-minimoowenh:odaapinigewaawasoo-minimooweny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
ogimaa-bineshiinh:ogimaa-bineshiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
oshkabinoojiinh:oshkabinoojiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
ozhaawashko-bineshiinh:ozhaawashko-bineshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
waawaabiganoojiinh:waawaabiganoojiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
wiibijiinh:wiibijiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
wiindigoo-bineshiinh:wiindigoo-bineshiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
wiishkobi-opin:wiishkobi-opiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
zazegaa-abinoojiinh:zazegaa-abinoojiiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
zegibanwaajiinh:zegibanwaajiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
zegibwanwaajiinh:zegibwanwaajiinhy1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
zhiiwi-opiniig:zhiiwi-opiny1 NA_Class=NA_VVny_Boundary ;
